Connecticut, session 2026, HB05402.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Subsection (a) of section 29-143i of the general statutes is
2 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
3 1, 2026):
4 (a) There is established the Connecticut Boxing Commission, which
5 shall be within the Department of Emergency Services and Public
6 Protection. The commission shall consist of nine members, three to be
7 appointed by the Governor, one to be appointed by the speaker of the
8 House of Representatives, one to be appointed by the president pro
9 tempore of the Senate, one to be appointed by the majority leader of the
10 House of Representatives, one to be appointed by the majority leader of
11 the Senate, one to be appointed by the minority leader of the House of
12 Representatives and one to be appointed by the minority leader of the
13 Senate. The initial appointments to the commission shall be made not
14 later than November 1, 1998. Notwithstanding the provisions of
HB5402 / File No. 265 1

HB5402 File No. 265
15 subsection (c) of section 4-9a, the terms of each member of the
16 commission shall be coterminous with the term of the appointing
17 authority or until a successor is chosen, whichever is later. The
18 appointing authority shall fill any vacancy for the unexpired portion of
19 the term. Members of the commission shall receive no compensation for
20 their services. The commission shall hold at least one meeting each
21 quarter.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 29-143i(a)
PS Joint Favorable
HB5402 / File No. 265 2

HB5402 File No. 265
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill, which makes a technical change to the Connecticut Boxing
Commission statute, has no fiscal impact.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
HB5402 / File No. 265 3

HB5402 File No. 265
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5402
AN ACT CONCERNING A TECHNICAL REVISION TO THE PUBLIC
SAFETY STATUTES.